test/src/morphology/V-keijw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - keijõ: # Verb 43 'eng /est käiata/fin' - full paradigm
     keijõ+V+Inf: keijõ
     keijõ+V+Ger: keijõs
     keijõ+V+Sup: keijõm
     keijõ+V+Sup+Ine: keijõmõs
     keijõ+V+Sup+Ela: keijõmõst
     keijõ+V+Sup+Tra: keijõmõks
     keijõ+V+Sup+Abe: keijõmõt
     keijõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kējõb
     keijõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: keijõt
     keijõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: keijõbõd
     keijõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kējiz
     keijõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kējizt, kējiztõ]
     keijõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kējizt, kējiztõ]
     keijõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: keij
     keijõ+V+Cond+Sg3: keijõks
     keijõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: keij
     keijõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: keij
     keijõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: keijõgid
     keijõ+V+Jus+Sg3: keijõg
     keijõ+V+Quo+Sg3: keijiji
     keijõ+V+ActPrfPrc: keijõn
     keijõ+V+PssPrfPrc: keijdõd
